District of Columbia statutes.
36-202

Unauthorized use of registered label; injunctive relief.

No person shall in any way use or display the label, brand, mark, name, or other character adopted by any such union or association as provided in § 36-201 without the consent or authority of such union or association; or counterfeit or imitate any such label, brand, mark, name, or other character, or knowingly sell, dispose of, keep, or have in his possession with intent to sell or dispose of any goods, wares, merchandise, or other products of labor, upon which any such counterfeit or imitation is attached, affixed, printed, stamped, or impressed, or knowingly sell, dispose of, keep, or have in his possession with intent to sell or dispose of any goods, wares, merchandise, or other products of labor contained in any box, case, can, or package, to which or on which any such counterfeit or imitation is attached, affixed, printed, painted, stamped, or impressed. If copies of such device have been filed, the union or association may maintain an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enjoin the manufacture, use, display, or sale of counterfeit or colorable imitations of such device, or of goods bearing the same, or the unauthorized use or display of such device or of goods bearing the same, and the Court may restrain such wrongful manufacture, use, display, or sale, and every unauthorized use or display by others of the genuine devices so registered and filed, if such use or display is not authorized by the owner thereof, and may award to the plaintiff such damages resulting from such wrongful manufacture, use, display, or sale as may be proved, together with the profits derived therefrom.

History

Feb. 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 50, ch. 47, § 2
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(55)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 36-203.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-402.
1973 Ed., § 48-402.